src/fst/morphology/affixes/nouns.lexc
LEXICON ÅABPETJH ! Resiproke og dim.
!!     - Default N_ODD plural lexicon: lexicon @LEXNAME@
                     +Pl+Nom:%>%^DISIMPh       FINAL1    ;
                     +Pl+Acc:%>idie            FINAL1    ;
                     +Pl+Gen:%>%^DISIMP        IGENSUFF  ;
                     +Pl+Ill:%>idie            FINAL1    ;
                     +Pl+Ine:%>inie            FINAL1    ;
                     +Pl+Ela:%>ijstie          FINAL1    ;
                     +Pl+Com:%>%^DISIMPigujmie FINAL1    ;
            +Pl+Com+Err/Orth:%>%^DISIMPigyjmie FINAL1    ;
                        +Ess:%>inie            FINAL1    ;
                  +Cmp/SgNom:e%^DISIMP         R         ;
                  +Cmp/PlGen:%>%^DISIMPi       R         ;
        +Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl:%»adtj            NIEJTE_PL ;
           +Der1+Der/Dimin+N:%»adtj            EVEN_ESS  ;
 +Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Cmp/SgNom:%»adtje           R         ;
 +Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Cmp/PlGen:%»adtj%>i         R         ;

 
!! LEXICON TJE_LASSJE_RESIPR
!        +Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl:%»adtj    NIEJTE_PL ;
!           +Der1+Der/Dimin+N:%»adtj    EVEN_ESS  ;
! +Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Cmp/SgNom:%»adtje   R         ;
! +Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Cmp/PlGen:%»adtj%>i R         ;


!LEXICON TJE_ETJE_RESIPR !not in use
!                          +Pl:%»edtj    NIEJTE_PL ;
!                          +Pl:%»edtj    EVEN_ESS  ;
!                   +Cmp/SgNom:edtje     R         ;
! +Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Cmp/PlGen:%»adtj%>i R         ;




LEXICON N_ODD_C   !these words have consonant-ending in nominative
+Sg: N_ODD_SG_Px ;

           +Sg+Nom:%^DISIMP     FINAL1         ;
           +Sg+Acc:e%>%^DISIMPm FINAL1         ;
           +Sg+Gen:e%>%^DISIMPn FINAL1         ;
           +Sg+Ill:%>asse       FINAL1         ; !Rule to delete Jesuse%>asse > Jesusasse
           +Sg+Ine:%>isnie      FINAL1         ;
           +Sg+Ela:%>istie      FINAL1         ;
           +Sg+Com:%>inie       FINAL1         ;
               +Pl:             N_ODD_PL       ;
                                N_ODD_ESS      ;
        +Cmp/SgNom:%^DISIMP     R              ;
        +Cmp/SgGen:e%>%^DISIMPn R              ;
        +Cmp/PlGen:%>%^DISIMPi  R              ;
 +Der1+Der/Dimin+N:%»adtj       GIERIEHTSADTJE ;




LEXICON AAREGE        !Sg+Nom=Aarege/Aareh  Sg+Cmp=Aarege-/Aareh- Redirects go GAAJSEGE, but adds also -ege and -h for Cmp
                                 LEEJJEGE ;  
         +Err/Orth:eh%^DISIMP  NOM-CMP   ;  
 +Cmp/SgNom+Use/NG:ege%^DISIMP R      ; ! Saemiej åålmegebiejjie ! Når -ege?
        +Cmp/AttrH:h%^DISIMP   R      ;   ! Saemiej åålmhbiejjie når -eh?


LEXICON BAARTEGE        !Sg+Nom=baartege/baarth  Sg+Cmp=baartege-/baarth- Cmp: -h, -ege, -egen, -egi
+Sg:eg N_ODD_SG_Px ;

    +Sg+Nom+Use/NG:h%^DISIMP      FINAL1         ;
           +Sg+Nom:ege%^DISIMP    FINAL1         ;
           +Sg+Acc:ege%>%^DISIMPm FINAL1         ;
           +Sg+Gen:ege%>%^DISIMPn FINAL1         ;
           +Sg+Ill:eg%>asse       FINAL1         ; !Rule to delete Jesuse%>asse > Jesusasse
           +Sg+Ine:eg%>isnie      FINAL1         ;
           +Sg+Ela:eg%>istie      FINAL1         ;
           +Sg+Com:eg%>inie       FINAL1         ;
               +Pl:eg             N_ODD_PL       ;
                  :eg             N_ODD_ESS      ;
         +Cmp/SgNom:h%^DISIMP      R              ;
         +Cmp/SgNom:ege%^DISIMP    R              ;
         +Cmp/SgGen:ege%>%^DISIMPn R              ;
         +Cmp/PlGen:eg%>%^DISIMPi  R              ;
 +Der1+Der/Dimin+N:eg%»adtj       GIERIEHTSADTJE ;


LEXICON GAAJSEGE        !Sg+Nom=gaajsege/gaajsh  Sg+Cmp=gaajsh- redirect to LEEJJEGE, but adds in addtion -eh for Sg+Nom and Cmp 
                            LEEJJEGE ;  !Check. Bare åårkeh-, ikke åårkege- ?
                 +Use/NG:eh%^DISIMP NOM-CMP   ; ! 
!                +Sg+Nom+Use/NG: FINAL1 ; ! is this one correct?   

! Test data:
!!€gt-norm: beetnege # Odd-syllable test
!!€ beetnege:            beetnege+N+Sg+Nom
!!€ beetneh:             beetnege+N+Sg+Nom
!!€ beetnegen:           beetnege+N+Sg+Gen
!!€ beetnegasse:         beetnege+N+Sg+Ill
!!€ beetnegisnie:        beetnege+N+Sg+Ine
!!€ beetnegistie:        beetnege+N+Sg+Ela
!!€ beetneginie:         beetnege+N+Sg+Com
!!€ beetnegh:            beetnege+N+Pl+Nom
!!€ beetnegidie:         beetnege+N+Pl+Acc
!!€ beetnegi:            beetnege+N+Pl+Gen
!!€ beetnegidie:         beetnege+N+Pl+Ill
!!€ beetneginie:         beetnege+N+Pl+Ine
!!€ beetnegijstie:       beetnege+N+Pl+Ela
!!€ beetnegigujmie:      beetnege+N+Pl+Com
!!€ beetneginie:         beetnege+N+Ess
                 

LEXICON LEEJJEGE        !Sg+Nom=leejjege  Sg+Cmp=leejjeh-  Cmp: -eh -egen -egi

+Sg:eg N_ODD_SG_Px ;

           +Sg+Nom:ege%^DISIMP    FINAL1         ;
           +Sg+Acc:ege%>%^DISIMPm FINAL1         ;
           +Sg+Gen:ege%>%^DISIMPn FINAL1         ;
           +Sg+Ill:eg%>asse       FINAL1         ; !Rule to delete Jesuse%>asse > Jesusasse
           +Sg+Ine:eg%>isnie      FINAL1         ;
           +Sg+Ela:eg%>istie      FINAL1         ;
           +Sg+Com:eg%>inie       FINAL1         ;
               +Pl:eg             N_ODD_PL       ;
                  :eg             N_ODD_ESS      ;
        +Cmp/SgNom:eh%^DISIMP     R              ;
        +Cmp/SgGen:ege%>%^DISIMPn R              ;
        +Cmp/PlGen:eg%>%^DISIMPi  R              ;
 +Der1+Der/Dimin+N:eg%»adtj       GIERIEHTSADTJE ;




LEXICON SAADTEGE        !Sg+Nom=saadtege  Sg+Cmp=saadtege-/saadth-
                         LAADTEGE ;
 +Cmp/SgNom+Use/NG:ege%^DISIMP R        ;

LEXICON LAADTEGE        !Sg+Nom=laadtege  Sg+Cmp=laadth-
+Sg:eg N_ODD_SG_Px ;

           +Sg+Nom:ege%^DISIMP    FINAL1         ;
           +Sg+Acc:ege%>%^DISIMPm FINAL1         ;
           +Sg+Gen:ege%>%^DISIMPn FINAL1         ;
           +Sg+Ill:eg%>asse       FINAL1         ; !Rule to delete Jesuse%>asse > Jesusasse
           +Sg+Ine:eg%>isnie      FINAL1         ;
           +Sg+Ela:eg%>istie      FINAL1         ;
           +Sg+Com:eg%>inie       FINAL1         ;
               +Pl:eg             N_ODD_PL       ;
                  :eg             N_ODD_ESS      ;
         +Cmp/SgNom:h%^DISIMP      R              ;
         +Cmp/SgGen:ege%>%^DISIMPn R              ;
         +Cmp/PlGen:eg%>%^DISIMPi  R              ;
 +Der1+Der/Dimin+N:eg%»adtj       GIERIEHTSADTJE ;




LEXICON DEAKEHKE        !Sg+Nom=deakehke/deakah  Sg+Cmp=deakehke-/deakah-

+Sg:k N_ODD_SG_Px ;
           +Sg+Nom:ke%^DISIMP    FINAL1         ; ! ==> fropmehke+Sg+Nom fropmehke
    +Sg+Nom+Use/NG:              FINAL1         ; ! => fropmehke+Sg+Nom fropmeh
           +Sg+Acc:ke%>%^DISIMPm FINAL1         ;
           +Sg+Gen:ke%>%^DISIMPn FINAL1         ;
           +Sg+Ill:k%>asse       FINAL1         ; ! Rule to delete Jesuse%>asse > Jesusasse
           +Sg+Ine:k%>isnie      FINAL1         ;
           +Sg+Ela:k%>istie      FINAL1         ;
           +Sg+Com:k%>inie       FINAL1         ;
               +Pl:k             N_ODD_PL       ;
                  :k             N_ODD_ESS      ;
         +Cmp/SgNom:              R              ;
         +Cmp/SgNom:ke%^DISIMP    R              ;
         +Cmp/SgGen:ke%>%^DISIMPn R              ;
         +Cmp/PlGen:k%>%^DISIMPi  R              ;
 +Der1+Der/Dimin+N:k%»adtj       GIERIEHTSADTJE ;
