src/fst/morphology/stems/nouns.lexc
LEXICON HyphNouns
san-åålmege+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Group_Hum:san-åålm AAREGE ;
LEXICON NounNoPx
åålmege+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Group_Hum:åålm AAREGE ;
åårkege+N+Sem/Dummytag:åårk GAAJSEGE ;
aarvehts+N+Sem/Dummytag:aarvehts N_ODD_C ;
åktsehts+N+Sem/Dummytag:åktsahts N_ODD_C ;
ålkoegaamege+N+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Clth:ålkoe#gaam AAREGE ; !gaamegisnie
båalmehth+N+Sem/Dummytag:båalmehth N_ODD_C ;
bahtsehke+N+Sem/Dummytag:bahtseh DEAKEHKE ;
beetnege+N+Sem/Money:beetn GAAJSEGE ;
biejjiegïjkehts+N+Sem/Dummytag:biejjie#gïjkehts N_ODD_C ;
bïevsterh+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Feat-psych:bïevster ÅABPETJH ;
byössege+N+Sem/Dummytag:byöss BAARTEGE ;
bysvehts+N+Sem/Act:bysvehts N_ODD_C ;
daeverh+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Dummytag:daevier ÅABPETJH ;
dajveåålmege+N+Sem/Group_Hum:dajve#åålm AAREGE ;
deakehke+N+Err/Orth+Sem/Buildpart:deahkah DEAKEHKE ;
deakehke+N+Sem/Buildpart:deakah DEAKEHKE ;
båassjoebealandeakehke+N+Sem/Buildpart:båassjoe#bealan#deakah DEAKEHKE ;
deatjalommes+N+Sem/Dummytag:deatjalommes N_ODD_C ;
deerpege+N+Sem/Dummytag:deerp BAARTEGE ;
dïjnehkh+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Dummytag:dïjnehk ÅABPETJH ;
duvtiebeetnege+N+Sem/Money:duvtie#beetn GAAJSEGE ;
eejhtege+v1+N+Sem/Hum+Use/DNorm:eejht GAAJSEGE ;
faadtegh+N+Sem/Dummytag:faadteg ÅABPETJH ;
fropmehke+N+Sem/Wthr:fropmeh DEAKEHKE ;
gåajhkohts+N+Sem/Dummytag:gåajhkohts N_ODD_C ;
doengeldh-gaamege+N+Sem/Clth:doengeldh-gaam AAREGE "lappete sko" ; !
gaarkehts+N+Sem/Dummytag:gaarkehts N_ODD_C ;
gaavesh+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Dummytag:gaaves ÅABPETJH ;
gaskesaadtege+N+Sem/Dummytag:gaske#saadt SAADTEGE ; ! e:mail
gåvles+N+Sem/Dummytag:gåvles N_ODD_C ;
gïevege+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Dummytag:gïev GAAJSEGE ;
gïjkehts+N+Sem/Dummytag:gïjkehts N_ODD_C ;
gïjrevïelkedh+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Dummytag:gïjre#vïelked ÅABPETJH "vårmat" ;
goeksege+N+Sem/Wthr+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:goeks BAARTEGE ;
goelkegaamege+N+Sem/Clth:goelke#gaam AAREGE ;
guaktegh+N+CmpNP/None+Sem/Dummytag:guaktag ÅABPETJH ;
hïejhtege+N+Sem/Dummytag:hïejht BAARTEGE ;
indiaanaåålmege+N+Sem/Group_Hum:indiaana#åålm AAREGE ;
inuihteåålmege+N+Sem/Group_Hum:inuihte#åålm AAREGE ;
jeerehts+N+Sem/Dummytag:jeerehts N_ODD_C ;
jïelege+N+Sem/Dummytag:jïel GAAJSEGE ;
jortege+N+Sem/Dummytag:jort GAAJSEGE ;
julevusaemienåålmege+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Group_Hum:julevu#saemien#åålm AAREGE ;
kraannasåålmege+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Group_Hum:kraannas#åålm AAREGE ;
kraavhkehts+N+Sem/Dummytag:kraavhkehts N_ODD_C ;
laadtege+N+Sem/Fruit:laadt LAADTEGE ;
låavtege+N+Sem/Obj-clo:låavt LAADTEGE ;
leejjege+N+Sem/Dummytag:leejj GAAJSEGE ;
lïenjegh+N+Sem/Dummytag:lïenjeg ÅABPETJH ;
lïestege+N+Sem/Dummytag:lïest BAARTEGE ;
lotnege+N+Sem/Dummytag:lotn AAREGE ;
maadtege+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Dummytag:maadt GAAJSEGE ;
mayaåålmege+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Group_Hum:maya#åålm AAREGE ;
meelhtegh+N+Sem/Dummytag:meelhteg ÅABPETJH ;
meessege+N+Sem/Dummytag:meess BAARTEGE ;
moehtege+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Dummytag:moeht BAARTEGE ;
naavlehts+N+Sem/Dummytag:naavlehts N_ODD_C ;
navajoåålmege+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Group_Hum:navajo#åålm AAREGE ;
neehlege+N+Sem/Dummytag:neehl BAARTEGE ;
njïetsege+N+Sem/Dummytag:njïets BAARTEGE ;
novsege+N+Sem/Dummytag:novs BAARTEGE ;
plïerehke+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Dummytag:plïereh DEAKEHKE ;
prïhtjegh+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Drink_Plant:prïhtjeg ÅABPETJH ;
raastege+N+Sem/Plc:raast GAAJSEGE ;
rïevtege+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Ani:rïevt BAARTEGE ;
rïjhkeraastege+N+Sem/Plc:rïjhke#raast GAAJSEGE ; !raasteh-
saadtege+N+Sem/Dummytag:saadt SAADTEGE ;
såågkes+N+Sem/Dummytag:såågkes N_ODD_C ;
seepegh+N+Sem/Dummytag:seepeg ÅABPETJH ;
sihtege+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Ani-fish:siht BAARTEGE ;
sïlpebeetnege+N+Sem/Money:sïlpe#beetn GAAJSEGE ;
smaarege+N+Sem/Lang:smaar GAAJSEGE ;
spoejege+N+Sem/Dummytag:spoej BAARTEGE ;
steeblege+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+OLang/NOB+Sem/Clth:steebl GAAJSEGE ;
syhtjegh+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Dummytag:syhtjeg ÅABPETJH ;
tjaalege+N+Sem/Txt:tjaal AAREGE ;
tjaasmege+N+Sem/Dummytag:tjaasm BAARTEGE ;
rudtjenmaadtege+N+Sem/Body_Mat:rudtjen#maadt GAAJSEGE ;
tjïektjes+N+Sem/Dummytag:tjïektjes N_ODD_C ;
trïblehkevoedtege+N+Sem/Dummytag:trïblehke#voedt BAARTEGE ;
tsegkiedeakehke+N+Sem/Dummytag:tsegkie#deakah DEAKEHKE ;
vaaltehth+N+Sem/Plc-elevate:vaaltehth N_ODD_C ;
vaareslåavtege+N+Sem/Build:vaares#låavt LAADTEGE ; 
voehpealmetjh+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:voehpe#almetj ÅABPETJH ;
maasteretjaalege+N+Sem/Txt:maastere#tjaal AAREGE ;
garre% fropmehke+N+Sem/Wthr:garre% fropmeh DEAKEHKE ; !vearelde 
övtiedimmiebeetnegh+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Money:övtiedimmie#beetneg ÅABPETJH ;
naehkiegaaresh+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Dummytag:naehkie#gaares ÅABPETJH ;
